SpellChecking/Dictionaries/gikuyu.aff
#ki_KE.aff - Gikuyu(KE) affix file for use in Hunspell
# Prepared by Kamau Chege

#Version 1.1
#Last Edit 06/09/2010

COMPLEXPREFIXES
NEEDAFFIX 001
CIRCUMFIX 002

FLAG num
SET UTF-8

WORDCHARS -'
TRY eiĩanrtocduũgmhbykw'jNRTCGDMHBEAUŨYOIĨKWJ


REP 41
REP s c
REP sh c
REP sh ch
REP ch c
REP c ch
REP f b
REP v b
REP l r
REP d nd
REP g ng
REP ng g
REP ng ng'
REP ng' ng
REP u ũ
REP ũ u
REP i ĩ
REP ĩ i
REP b mb
REP mb b
REP j nj
REP dh th
REP i ii
REP ii i
REP u uu
REP uu u
REP a aa
REP aa a
REP e ee
REP ee e
REP ĩ ĩĩ
REP ĩĩ ĩ
REP ũ ũũ
REP ũũ ũ
REP o oo
REP oo o
REP ũa wa
REP ĩa ya
REP ya ĩa 
REP ũo wo
REP wo ũo
REP ũi wi



PFX 201 Y 25
PFX 201 mb kab mb
PFX 201 mb tũb mb
PFX 201 mb kĩb mb
PFX 201 mb rũb mb
PFX 201 mb mab mb
PFX 201 nd gat nd
PFX 201 nd tũt nd
PFX 201 nd gĩt nd
PFX 201 nd rũt nd
PFX 201 nd mat nd
PFX 201 nj gac nj
PFX 201 nj tũc nj
PFX 201 nj gĩc nj
PFX 201 nj rũc nj
PFX 201 nj mac nj
PFX 201 ng kag ng
PFX 201 ng tũg ng
PFX 201 ng kĩg ng
PFX 201 ng rũg ng
PFX 201 ng mag ng
PFX 201 ng' kag ng'
PFX 201 ng' tũg ng'
PFX 201 ng' kĩg ng'
PFX 201 ng' rũg ng'
PFX 201 ng' mag ng'

PFX 202 Y 16
PFX 202 0 ka [abmngrw][^bdngj]
PFX 202 0 tũ [abmngrw][^bdngj]
PFX 202 0 kĩ [abmngrw][^bdngj]
PFX 202 0 rũ .
PFX 202 0 ma .
PFX 202 i ka i[^cktĩ]
PFX 202 i tũ i[^cktĩ]
PFX 202 i kĩ i[^cktĩ]
PFX 202 i rũ i
PFX 202 i ma i
PFX 202 0 ga [cktĩ]
PFX 202 0 tũ [cktĩ]
PFX 202 0 gĩ [cktĩ]
PFX 202 i ga i[cktĩ]
PFX 202 i tũ i[cktĩ]
PFX 202 i gĩ i[cktĩ]
